Arkansas, session 2025, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-16-706, concerning the topics on which
questions are required to be included in the written driver’s license test,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) The safe operation of a motor vehicle in a highway work
zone.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-18-108(5), concerning the required
*JLL010*
01/15/2025 1:51:48 PM JLL010

SB78
contents of the driver’s instruction manual, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Information about highway work zone safety, including
without limitation:
(A) The effects and hazards of unsafe driving through
highway work zones; and the
(B) The penalties for violations for driving unsafely
through highway work zones;
(C) Statistics concerning the dangers of a motor vehicle
operator committing a moving violation in a highway work zone;
(D) Testimonials from highway construction workers and
their families;
(E) Information on the importance of awareness and slowing
down in highway work zones; and
(F) A question-and-answer section concerning the safe
operation of a motor vehicle in a highway work zone.





















01/15/2025 1:51:48 PM JLL010